test/src/morphology/N-baeqzmwr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - bäʼzmõr: # Noun 238 'eng /est päsmer/fin' - full paradigm
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Nom: bäʼzmõr
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Gen: bäʼzmõr
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Par: bäʼzmõrt
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Dat: bäʼzmõrõn
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Ins: bäʼzmõrõks
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Ill: bäʼzmõrõ
     bäʼzmõr+N+Sg+Ela: bäʼzmõrõst
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Nom: bäʼzmõrd
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Gen: bäʼzmõrd
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Par: bäʼzmõri
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Dat: bäʼzmõrdõn
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Ins: bäʼzmõrdõks
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Ill: bäʼzmõriž
     bäʼzmõr+N+Pl+Ela: bäʼzmõrist
